Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20218-101.02
Act, how cited.

Sections 8-101.02 to 8-1,143 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Banking Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 32;

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB327, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB891, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 8-101.01;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB649, § 32.